California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(d) Two members shall be citrus nursery operators, one representing northern California, defined as counties in the San Joaquin Valley and north but not including counties on the coast who shall be represented by a southern California designee, and one representing southern California, appointed by the secretary from the nominees recommended by the committee.

(e) (1) The initial members of the committee shall be appointed within 30 days of the enactment of this article. The members shall serve staggered terms. The terms of the members of the committee shall expire as follows:

(A) Two members on September 30, 2010.

(B) Five members on September 30, 2011.

(C) Five members
 on September 30, 2012.

(D) Five members on September 30, 2013.

(2) The members of the committee shall allocate the initial terms among themselves by lot or other method.

(f) Appointments to the committee shall be for terms of four years. Vacancies shall be immediately filled by the secretary based on recommendations from the committee for the unexpired portion of the terms in which they occur.

(g) The secretary and other appropriate individuals, including, but not limited to, county agricultural commissioners, pest control advisors, and representatives of the University of California and California State University systems, as determined by the secretary, in consultation with the committee, shall be nonvoting ex officio members of the committee.

(h) Committee members may be compensated for reasonable expenses actually incurred in the performance of their duties, as determined by the secretary after consultation with the committee.

(i) The committee shall meet at the request of the secretary, the committee chairperson, or upon the request of three committee members.

(j) The committee shall appoint a chairperson, one or more vice chairpersons, and any other officers it deems necessary.

(k) The Legislature finds and declares that persons appointed to the committee are intended to represent and further the interests of the citrus industry, and that this representation and furtherance is intended to serve the public interest. Accordingly, the Legislature finds that, with respect to persons who are
 appointed to the committee, the citrus industry is tantamount to, and constitutes, the public generally within the meaning of Section 87103 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 426, Sec. 1.   (AB 281)   Effective October 11, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 5927.)
-------------------------------------------

5915.

(a) The powers and duties of the committee are limited to activities involving the producers of citrus fruit and residential owners of citrus fruit or other host material.

(b) The committee may do all of the following:

(1) Develop, subject to the approval of the secretary, a statewide citrus specific pest and disease work plan that includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(A) Informational programs to educate and train residential owners of citrus fruit, local communities, groups, and individuals on the prevention of pests, and diseases and their vectors, specific to
 citrus.

(B) Programs for surveying, detecting, analyzing, and treating pests and diseases specific to citrus involving producers of citrus fruit and residential owners of citrus fruit and host materials, except as provided in Section 5930.

(2) Submit recommendations to the secretary on, but not limited to, the following:

(A) Annual assessment rate.

(B) Annual budget.

(C) Expenditures necessary to implement the statewide work plan developed pursuant to this section.

(D) The amount of fees to be levied, as provided in Section 5919.

(E) The receipt of money from other sources to pay any obligation of the committee and to accomplish the purposes of the committee in the manner provided in this article.

(3) Recommend to the secretary the adoption of regulations consistent with the powers and duties of the committee.

(c) The committee shall not engage in any activity deemed by the secretary to be contradictory to any eradication program or quarantine implemented to combat citrus specific pests, diseases, or related vectors.

(d) For any program or activity occurring pursuant to this section, the department shall be the lead agency, unless an agreement is reached between the committee and
 the secretary to authorize another agency within the state or local government to act as lead for specific activities.

(e) Any program or activity submitted by the committee to, and approved by, the secretary pursuant to this section shall not be altered without first notifying the committee of the alteration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 924, Sec. 2.   (SB 1018)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 5927.)
-------------------------------------------

5916.

(a) Upon receipt of a recommendation from the committee for the adoption of regulations, the secretary shall do one of the following within 30 working days:

(1) Initiate the rulemaking process to adopt the recommendation of the committee.

(2) Decline to initiate the rulemaking process and provide the committee with a written statement of reasons for the decision.

(3) Request the committee to provide additional information regarding the recommended regulations.

(b) All regulations adopted pursuant to this article shall be adopted in compliance with the
 Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and may be subsequently repealed or amended as provided for in that act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 426, Sec. 1.   (AB 281)   Effective October 11, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 5927.)
-------------------------------------------

5917.

No member or agent of the committee shall be personally liable for the actions of the committee or the department. No member or agent of the committee is responsible individually in any way to any other person for errors in judgment, mistakes, or other acts, by either commission or omission, as a principal, agent, or employee except for his or her own individual acts of dishonesty or crime. No member or agent of the committee is responsible individually for an act or omission of any other member or agent of the committee or the department. Liability is several and not joint, and no member or agent of the committee is liable for the default of any other member or agent of the committee or the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 426, Sec. 1.   (AB 281)   Effective October 11, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 5927.)
-------------------------------------------

5918.

(a) The committee shall reimburse the secretary for all expenditures incurred by the secretary in carrying out his or her duties and responsibilities pursuant to this article, including the costs of implementing and administering the administrative, enforcement, and regulatory recommendations of the statewide work plan developed by the committee.

(b) The secretary shall not seek reimbursement for costs that exceed expenditures developed by the committee without first notifying the committee of the additional expenditures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 374, Sec. 4.   (AB 862)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 5927.)
-------------------------------------------

5919.

(a) During the first marketing season, beginning February 1, 2010, and ending September 30, 2010, the monthly assessment to be paid by producers shall be one cent ($0.01) per carton. Thereafter, in addition to any other assessments, fees, or charges that may be required pursuant to this code, producers shall pay a monthly assessment established by the committee that shall not exceed twelve cents ($0.12) per carton. The assessment shall be:

(1) Based on the number of 40-pound carton equivalents produced.

(2) Collected from the producer by the first handler. If a producer prepares the citrus fruit for market, the producer shall be deemed the handler.

(3) Remitted to the department by the first handler, along with an assessment report, at the end of each month during the marketing season.

(4) Deposited in the Citrus Disease Management Account in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund or, upon the recommendation of the committee, deposited in accordance with Section 227 or Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 230) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 1. The use of the funds deposited in the Citrus Disease Management Account shall be limited to the activities authorized by this article.

(b) A producer producing less than 750 40-pound carton equivalents shall not be required to remit the assessment provided in subdivision (a).

(c) The committee may recommend to the secretary an assessment less than the
 amount specified in subdivision (a) or no assessment if no disease prevention program is necessary or if there is sufficient reserve to operate the program, except as provided in Section 5930.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 279, Sec. 1.   (SB 822)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 5927.)
-------------------------------------------

5920.

(a) Upon establishment of a disease prevention program, any handler who does not file the required monthly assessment report and assessments by the 10th day of the month following the month for which the assessment is payable shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the assessment owed and, in addition, 112 percent interest per month on the unpaid balance.

(b) Upon establishment of a disease prevention program, it shall be unlawful for any handler to refuse to collect the assessments or remit the assessments and the proper reports required by this article.

(c) A handler shall not charge
 a producer an administrative fee for collecting or remitting an assessment.

(d) A producer who disputes the amount of the assessment may file a claim with the secretary. The producer shall prove his or her claim by a preponderance of the evidence.

(e) A producer may not bring any claim against a handler for damages, or otherwise, in connection with the assessment or the required deduction by the handler of the moneys owed to the producer as provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 426, Sec. 1.   (AB 281)   Effective October 11, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 5927.)
-------------------------------------------

5921.

No later than June 30, 2013, the secretary shall hold one or more public hearings to determine whether the operation of this article should be continued. Thereafter, the secretary shall conduct the review process every four years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 426, Sec. 1.   (AB 281)   Effective October 11, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 5927.)
-------------------------------------------

5922.

(a) If the secretary finds after the hearing that a substantial question of opposition exists among affected producers under this article regarding whether the operation of this article should be continued, the secretary shall submit the article for approval utilizing the following voting procedures set forth in this section and Sections 5923 to 5927, inclusive. As used in this subdivision, “substantial question of opposition” means opposition to the substance of the petition among currently affected producers, and is not intended to mean a particular number of producers.

(b) Within 90 days of the secretary determining the requirement for referendum has been met, the secretary shall establish a list of persons eligible to vote on the continued
 implementation of this article.

(c) Eligibility shall be limited to producers who paid the assessment on citrus fruit in the immediately preceding marketing season.

(d) (1) In establishing the list, the secretary may require handlers, producers, and others to submit the names, mailing addresses, and assessment values of all producers who paid the assessment on citrus fruit in the immediately preceding marketing season.

(2) The information required by the secretary shall be filed either with the monthly assessment form or no later than 30 days following receipt of a written notice from the secretary requesting the information.

(e) Any producer whose name does not appear on the secretary’s list may have his or her name added to the
 list by filing with the secretary a signed statement identifying himself or herself as a producer that paid an assessment during the most recent marketing season.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 426, Sec. 1.   (AB 281)   Effective October 11, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 5927.)
-------------------------------------------

5923.

For the purpose of voting in the referendum required in Section 5922, only a producer required to pay the assessment pursuant to Section 5919 shall have the right to vote.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 426, Sec. 1.   (AB 281)   Effective October 11, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 5927.)
-------------------------------------------

5924.

In determining whether this article shall become inoperative, the secretary shall find that at least 40 percent of the total number of producers from the list established by the secretary participated in the referendum, and that either one of the following occurred:

(a) Fifty-five percent or more of the producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of this article, and the producers who voted paid a majority of the assessment dollars on citrus fruit in the preceding marketing season that were paid by all the producers who voted in the referendum.

(b) A majority of the producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of this article, and the producers who voted paid 55 percent or more of the
 assessment dollars on citrus fruit in the preceding marketing season that were paid by all the producers who voted in the referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 426, Sec. 1.   (AB 281)   Effective October 11, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 5927.)
-------------------------------------------

5925.

The secretary shall establish a period in which to conduct the referendum that shall not be less than 10 days nor more than 60 days in duration. The secretary may prescribe additional procedures to conduct the referendum. If the initial period established is less than 60 days, the secretary may extend the period. However, the total referendum period may not exceed 60 days.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 426, Sec. 1.   (AB 281)   Effective October 11, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 5927.)
-------------------------------------------

5926.

Nonreceipt of a ballot shall not invalidate a referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 426, Sec. 1.   (AB 281)   Effective October 11, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 5927.)
-------------------------------------------

5927.

(a) If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has not been given as provided in this article, this article shall become inoperative within one year of the end of the referendum period.

(b) If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has been given as provided in this article, he or she shall certify and give notice of the favorable vote to all persons whose names and addresses may be on file with the secretary as provided in Section 5922.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 426, Sec. 1.   (AB 281)   Effective October 11, 2009.   Note: Inoperation clause in subd. (a) applies to Article 2, comprising Sections 5911 to 5940.)
-------------------------------------------

5928.

Upon termination of this article, and based upon a recommendation of the committee subject to approval by the secretary, any collected assessments not required to defray financial obligations incurred pursuant to this article shall be returned on a pro rata basis to all persons from whom assessments were collected during the marketing season immediately preceding the date of termination or paid to any existing state or federal program engaged in citrus specific pest and disease prevention activities. The assessments refunded to handlers shall be paid to producers if the assessment was previously deducted from moneys owed to the producer by the handler.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 426, Sec. 1.   (AB 281)   Effective October 11, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 5927.)
-------------------------------------------

5930.

No later than July 1, 2011, the committee, in consultation with the department, shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with citrus pest control districts responsible for funding citrus tristeza virus prevention activities, pursuant to Part 5 (commencing with Section 8401) of Division 4, for the purpose of funding the implementation of the citrus tristeza virus effective plan. The memorandum of understanding shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a) Language providing that the programs, protocols, and implementation for the citrus tristeza virus effective plan will be developed and approved by the Technical Advisory Committee, or its successor, in consultation with the committee.

(b) Provision for the funding required to implement the citrus tristeza virus effective plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 426, Sec. 1.   (AB 281)   Effective October 11, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 5927.)
-------------------------------------------

5931.

In the event the committee and the citrus pest control districts do not agree on the terms of the memorandum of understanding as prescribed in Section 5930, the citrus pest control districts shall conduct an election to determine which entity shall provide funding for the citrus tristeza virus effective plan. The ballot shall ask landowners within the citrus pest control districts to select either (1) the California Citrus Pest and Disease Prevention Committee and the Department of Food and Agriculture through the Citrus Disease Management Account to fund the citrus tristeza virus effective plan or (2) the citrus pest control districts as the funding entity of the citrus tristeza virus effective plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 72.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 5927.)
-------------------------------------------

5940.

(a) The provisions of this article are severable.

(b) If any provision of this article or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 426, Sec. 1.   (AB 281)   Effective October 11, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 5927.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Sterile Mexican Fruit Fly Production Facility [5951. - 5953.]

5951.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The introduction of Mexican fruit flies into California presents a serious threat to California’s economy. 

(b) The use of alternative methods for pest control is generally preferred to the aerial application of pesticides over urban areas. 

(c) The use of sterile flies has proven to be one of the most effective nonchemical procedures in the successful control and eradication of Mexican fruit flies. 

(d) California does not have a reliable source of sterile Mexican fruit flies that may be used to control future infestations of this pest. 

(e) The federal government, other states, the agricultural industry, and the country of Mexico would all benefit from a reliable source of sterile Mexican fruit flies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 489, Sec. 1.   Effective October 7, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5952.

The director may establish and operate a facility outside of this state to produce sterile Mexican fruit flies or enter into an agreement with any other public or private entity to jointly establish and operate the facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 489, Sec. 1.   Effective October 7, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5953.

Any contract entered into by the department to determine the appropriate location, select a suitable facility, or prepare preliminary plans and working drawings is exempt from the Public Contract Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 489, Sec. 1.   Effective October 7, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Cotton Pest Control [6001. - 6006.6.]

6001.

It is hereby declared that the cotton industry of this state is threatened with the invasion of cotton boll weevil and pink bollworm of cotton. These two pests, if established in this state, will cause losses of several million dollars per year to this state’s number one field crop. The purpose of this article is the prevention of the introduction of these two pests into this state and it is not intended to set a precedent, supersede, or change the normal methods of acting to control or eradicate newly established pests in this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

6002.

The director, or an entity designated by the Cotton Pest Control Board, may contract with the United States Department of Agriculture for the purpose of controlling, suppressing, or eradicating cotton boll weevil or pink bollworm in this state, the State of Arizona, or the Republic of Mexico to prevent the entry and establishment of these pests in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 953, Sec. 1.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

6003.

“First handler” means the first person who, as owner, agent, or broker, purchases, or otherwise acquires from a grower, possession or control of cotton.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 167, Sec. 1.   Effective June 30, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

6005.

(a) Every grower of cotton in the state shall pay a fee of three dollars ($3) for each bale of cotton ginned or for each bale of cotton sold by a grower in this state who received the cotton under the federal payment-in-kind program, Section 700 et seq. of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations. 

(b) The fee is a maximum fee. The amount of the fee may vary from district to district in accordance with the protection afforded to the cotton crop in the districts. The director may establish districts in the state for the purpose of fixing the fee. Between February 1 and June 30 of each year, the Cotton Pest Control Board shall recommend to the director the amount of the fee that it determines to be necessary to carry out this article in each district. The director may fix the fee at a less amount, when it is determined that the cost of administering this article can be defrayed with the below-maximum fee. The amount of the fee shall be effective for the next fiscal year. The fee shall be paid to the director or the entity designated by the Cotton Pest Control Board at the time the cotton is ginned or by the first handler when the cotton is sold in the case of cotton received by growers under the federal payment-in-kind program, Section 700 et seq. of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The first handler shall deduct the fee from any moneys owed to the grower. To determine the number of payment-in-kind bales on which the fee is calculated that the first handler pays to the director, the first handler shall divide each grower’s total payment-in-kind entitlement pounds of cotton by 500. 

(c) The amount received from fees and other sources of income shall be deposited and handled in a manner determined by the Cotton Pest Control Board and shall be used exclusively to pay costs directly related to the control of pink bollworm or other related cotton pests. 

(d) Fees which have not been expended by the termination date of this article shall be refunded. 

(e) Moneys received from other sources for this program may be used to carry out the purposes of this article. 

(f) The Cotton Pest Control Board may hire any and all necessary personnel, contract for services, and incur all other expenses necessary to carry out the purposes of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 255, Sec. 2.   Effective July 29, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

6006.

The director shall appoint a Cotton Pest Control Board, consisting of 10 members, to assist and advise him or her on matters which pertain to the control of cotton pests and to carry out its authority specified in this article.

The membership shall consist of at least one cottongrower from each of the major cotton-growing counties in the state, and one member who is not a cottongrower and who represents the public.

Any member of the board who misses two meetings without the permission of the board, is deemed to have resigned as a member of the board.

The board may meet in regular session each month. The chairperson of the board or the director may call any other meeting of the board at
 any time. Each member shall be allowed per diem and mileage in accordance with Department of Human Resources rules for attending any meeting of the board.

The board shall annually review the effectiveness of the cotton pest control program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 665, Sec. 15.   (SB 1308)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

6006.5.

It is hereby declared, as a matter of legislative determination, that cottongrowers appointed to the Cotton Pest Control Board pursuant to this article are intended to represent and further the interest of a particular agricultural industry concerned, and that such representation and furtherance is intended to serve the public interest. Accordingly, the Legislature finds that, with respect to persons who are appointed to such board, the particular agricultural industry concerned is tantamount to, and constitutes, the public generally within the meaning of Section 87103 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1429.)
-------------------------------------------

6006.6.

Any decision made by the Cotton Pest Control Board which results in an entity other than the department administering this article shall be made not later than May 1 of any year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 953, Sec. 3.5.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Field Rodents [6021. - 6024.]

6021.

If the director receives a report from the executive officer of the State Department of Health Services which states that field rodents in a certain area carry, or are likely to carry, any disease, insect, or other vector of any disease which is transmissible and injurious to humans, he shall forthwith advise the commissioner of the county in which such rodents exist.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

6022.

The commissioner shall cooperate in suppressing field rodents and insects, or other associated vectors of rodent-borne diseases transmissible and injurious to humans.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 897.)
-------------------------------------------

6023.

The director shall cooperate by entering into an agreement pursuant to Section 482 for the purpose of suppressing the field rodents and insects or other associated vectors in the reported areas and in neighboring areas, to prevent the spread of the rodents and insects, or other associated vectors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 897.)
-------------------------------------------

6024.

In order to carry out the purposes of this article, the director or commissioner may enter upon any and all premises within any reported area or neighboring area to bait, trap, expose chemically treated baits, or perform any act which he deems necessary for the purpose of suppressing, destroying, or repelling the rodents and insects, or other associated vectors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 897.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.5. Vertebrate Pest Control Research [6025. - 6029.]

6025.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The continued viability of the agricultural economy is of paramount importance to the people of this state.

(b) Vertebrate pests cause an estimated two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) damage to agricultural crops each year, and without effective controls, the losses and damage could reach one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000) annually.

(c) The use of materials to control vertebrate pests benefits the public health by preventing rodent-borne diseases that could be transmitted, and be injurious, to humans.

(d) County departments of agriculture have historically provided vertebrate pest control materials to the agricultural community.

(e) Recent changes in the federal law require the development of extensive data and the payment of registration fees in order to register these materials, and these requirements are costly. Research studies to develop this data will be required if these valuable control materials are to be maintained.

(f) It is appropriate that the necessary research be funded by an assessment on the vertebrate pest control materials for which these studies are required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 757, Sec. 1.   Repealed as of January 1, 2035, pursuant to Section 6029.)
-------------------------------------------

6025.2.

For purposes of this article, “vertebrate pest” means any specie of mammal, bird, reptile, amphibian, or fish that causes damage to agricultural, natural, or industrial resources, or to any other resource, and to the public health or safety.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 176, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.   Repealed as of January 1, 2035, pursuant to Section 6029.)
-------------------------------------------

6025.3.

For purposes of this article, “research” means basic and applied research. Basic research is experimental or theoretical work undertaken primarily to acquire new knowledge of the underlying foundation of phenomena and observable facts, without any particular application or use in view. Applied research is also original investigation undertaken in order to acquire new knowledge, but it is conducted to solve practical problems or objectives.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 176, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.   Repealed as of January 1, 2035, pursuant to Section 6029.)
-------------------------------------------

6025.4.

Notwithstanding Section 597u of the Penal Code, carbon monoxide may be used for the control of burrowing rodent pests, provided the following conditions are met:

(a) The carbon monoxide delivery device shall be permanently affixed with a warning label in plain view of the operator that includes, at a minimum, the following information:
DANGER: Carbon monoxide is a poisonous gas that is odorless and colorless. Exposure to carbon monoxide can kill within minutes. Never use in structures inhabited by humans or livestock. The device must be used in accordance with all existing laws and regulations including Chapter 1.5 (commencing with
 Section 2050) of Division 3 of, known as the California Endangered Species Act, and Sections 4002 and 4003 of, the Fish and Game Code.
(b) The use of carbon monoxide is subject to the requirements of Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3 of, known as the California Endangered Species Act, and Sections 4002 and 4003 of, the Fish and Game Code, and the requirements of Division 6 (commencing with Section 11401) and Division 7 (commencing with Section 12500).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 254, Sec. 1.   (AB 1959)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2035, pursuant to Section 6029.)
-------------------------------------------

6025.5.

(a) The secretary shall establish and administer a research program to control vertebrate pests that pose a significant threat to the welfare of the state’s agricultural economy, infrastructure, and the public.

(b) The specific purposes of the program include all of the following:

(1) The investigation of effective and economical alternative materials for the control of vertebrate pests, including carbon monoxide to control burrowing rodent pests.

(2) The solicitation and consideration of research proposals for alternative humane methods of control.

(3) The continuation of current vertebrate pest control product registration at the state level until alternative products are developed that prove to be effective and economical.

(4) The funding of research for the development of scientific data to fulfill registration requirements.

(5) Cooperation with the United States Department of Agriculture in funding research programs to maintain, develop, and register vertebrate pest control materials used in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 407, Sec. 3.   (AB 634)   Effective January 1, 2012.   Repealed as of January 1, 2035, pursuant to Section 6029.)
-------------------------------------------

6026.

The secretary shall establish the Vertebrate Pest Control Research Advisory Committee consisting of the following members, appointed by the secretary, to serve at the pleasure of the secretary:

(a) One representative of the department.

(b) One representative of the California Agricultural Commissioners and Sealers Association.

(c) Five representatives of the agricultural industry representing affected commodities.

(d) One representative of the University of California.

(e) One representative of the California State University.

(f) One representative of the State Department of Health Services.

(g) One representative of the general public, with consideration given to a person with expertise in animal welfare.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 176, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2006.   Repealed as of January 1, 2035, pursuant to Section 6029.)
-------------------------------------------

6026.5.

On or before December 31 of each year, the committee shall recommend to the secretary priorities for conducting various vertebrate pest control research projects and the amount of the assessment necessary to carry out those research projects.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 176, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2006.   Repealed as of January 1, 2035, pursuant to Section 6029.)
-------------------------------------------

6027.

There is hereby created the Vertebrate Pest Control Research Account in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the money in the account is continuously appropriated to the secretary for purposes of carrying out this article. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the moneys in the account shall not be transferred to any other fund or encumbered or expended for any purpose other than as provided in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 176, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2006.   Repealed as of January 1, 2035, pursuant to Section 6029.)
-------------------------------------------

6027.1.

Expenditure of funds pursuant to this article shall be limited to the following:

(a) Reasonable administrative and operational expenses of the committee and the department, subject to the recommendation of an annual budget by the committee and approval by the secretary.

(b) Federal and state regulatory fees for the continued registration of vertebrate pest control materials and the registration of new materials.

(c) Basic and applied research as described in Section 6025.3.

(d) Educational outreach on the subject
 of vertebrate pest control methods, including, but not limited to, the safe use of carbon monoxide to control burrowing rodent pests.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 407, Sec. 4.   (AB 634)   Effective January 1, 2012.   Repealed as of January 1, 2035, pursuant to Section 6029.)
-------------------------------------------

6027.5.

During the calendar year, each commissioner shall pay to the secretary a fee not to exceed fifty cents ($0.50) per pound of vertebrate pest control material sold, distributed, or applied by the county for vertebrate pest control purposes, less the amount necessary to recover the cost of complying with the provisions of this article, as determined by the secretary. No assessment shall be imposed on the sale or on the distribution of vertebrate pest control material by a county agricultural commissioner to another commissioner. Vertebrate pest control material registered by the secretary may only be sold or distributed by a county agricultural commissioner or as authorized by the secretary.

The secretary may set a different level of assessment in the amount necessary to provide revenue for the vertebrate pest control research projects carried out pursuant to this article only if the secretary, at a minimum, has consulted with the Vertebrate Pest Control Research Advisory Committee. The new level of assessment may only commence at the beginning of the subsequent calendar year. However, the assessment shall not exceed one dollar ($1) per pound of vertebrate control material sold, distributed, or applied by the county for vertebrate pest control purposes. To assist the advisory committee in making its recommendations, the department shall submit a progress report to the members of the advisory committee at least 30 days prior to each meeting of the advisory committee. The report shall include, but is not limited to, data on research that has been, or is proposed to be, conducted and statements regarding the necessity for that research. This section does not preclude the department from preparing and distributing additional reports that may be requested by the advisory committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 176, Sec. 7.5.   Effective January 1, 2006.   Repealed as of January 1, 2035, pursuant to Section 6029.)
-------------------------------------------

6028.

The assessment payments required pursuant to Section 6027.5, together with a report of the amount of vertebrate pest control materials sold, distributed, or applied during the previous six-month period, shall be made biannually by each commissioner to the secretary within one calendar month after June 30 and December 31 of each year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 176, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2006.   Repealed as of January 1, 2035, pursuant to Section 6029.)
-------------------------------------------

6029.

This article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2035, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 198, Sec. 1.   (AB 1505)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2035, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Article 6.5, commencing with Section 6025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Beet Leafhopper Control [6031. - 6043.]

6031.
